Illinois, session 104th, HB3106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Budget Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 650-37 as follows: 7    (15 ILCS 20/50-37 new)8    Sec. 50-37. Additions to budget implementation bill or 9omnibus bill. Any amendment to a budget implementation bill or 10to an omnibus appropriations bill must be reported to the 11applicable appropriations committee of each chamber of the 12General Assembly at least 2 business days before being heard 13in any committee. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.